Tennessee, session 114, HB0042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-225(f), is amended by deleting
the language "July 1, 2025, and by each July 1" and substituting instead the language "August
1, 2025, and by each August 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0042
000972
- 1 -